src/fst/incoming/Blackfoot_weighted.lexc
LEXICON PREFIXES2
@P.count1.N@@P.count1.T@@P.count1.A@@P.count1.P@@P.count1.N@@P.count1.T@@P.count1.A@@P.count1.P@0 PN_COUNTER1 ;
@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2máát BOUND2 "weight: 4.85198" ;
@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2miin BOUND2 "weight: 4.85198" ;
@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2piin BOUND2 "weight: 12.6418" ;
@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@PV/máátaommita'p+:@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@%^SPmáátaommita'p BOUND2 "weight: 25.2836" ;
@P.count1.P@PV/ikátá'+:@P.count1.P@i2kátá' BOUND2 "weight: 8.77065" ;
@P.count1.T@Imm+:@P.count1.T@ayáak BOUND2 "weight: 25.2836" ;
@P.count1.T@Dur+:@P.count1.T@á BOUND2 "weight: 6.6912" ;
@P.count1.T@Fut+:@P.count1.T@yáak BOUND2 "weight: 8.77065" ;
@P.count1.T@Past+:@P.count1.T@ii BOUND2 "weight: 6.50196" ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@akáa BOUND2 "weight: 6.25834" ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@ikáa BOUND2 "weight: 6.25834" ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@okáa BOUND2 "weight: 6.25834" ; ! enumerating this one because it appears in these three forms

LEXICON BOUND2
0:%< PN_COUNTER1  ;

!! This counter ensures that each type of prenoun can only appear once in the following order: 0, Negation | 0, Tense | 0, Aspect | 0, then ikata'

LEXICON PN_COUNTER1
@D.pvcountf@@R.count1.N@@P.pvcountf.1@@R.count1.N@ PREFIXES2 ;
@R.pvcountf.1@@R.count1.A@@P.pvcountf.2@@R.count1.A@ PREFIXES2 ;
@R.pvcountf.2@@R.count1.T@@P.pvcountf.3@@R.count1.T@ PREFIXES2 ;
@R.pvcountf.3@@R.count1.P@@P.pvcountf.4@@R.count1.P@ PREFIXES2 ;
0 PRENOUNS ;

LEXICON BOUND3
0:%< PN_COUNTER  ;

LEXICON PN_COUNTER
@D.pvcount@@P.pvcount.1@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.1@@P.pvcount.2@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.2@@P.pvcount.3@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.3@@P.pvcount.4@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.4@@P.pvcount.5@ PRENOUNS ;
! @R.pvcount.5@@P.pvcount.6@ PRENOUNS ;


LEXICON PREFIXES
@P.count1.N@@P.count1.T@@P.count1.A@@P.count1.P@@P.count1.N@@P.count1.T@@P.count1.A@@P.count1.P@0 PV_COUNTER1 ;
@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2máát BOUND1 "weight: 4.85198" ;
@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2miin BOUND1 "weight: 4.85198" ;
@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2piin BOUND1 "weight: 12.6418" ;
@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@PV/máátaommita'p+:@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@%^SPmáátaommita'p BOUND1 "weight: 25.2836" ;
@P.count1.P@PV/ikátá'+:@P.count1.P@i2kátá' BOUND1 "weight: 8.77065" ;
@P.count1.T@Imm+:@P.count1.T@ayáak BOUND1 "weight: 25.2836" ;
@P.count1.T@Dur+:@P.count1.T@á BOUND1 "weight: 6.6912" ;
@P.count1.T@Fut+:@P.count1.T@yáak BOUND1 "weight: 8.77065" ;
@P.count1.T@Past+:@P.count1.T@ii BOUND1 "weight: 6.50196" ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@akáa BOUND1 "weight: 6.25834" ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@ikáa BOUND1 "weight: 6.25834" ;
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@okáa BOUND1 "weight: 6.25834" ; ! enumerating this one because it appears in these three forms

LEXICON BOUND1
0:%< PV_COUNTER1  ;

!! This counter ensures that each type of prenoun can only appear once in the following order: Negation | 0, Tense | 0, Aspect | 0, then ikata' | 0.

LEXICON PV_COUNTER1
@D.pvcountf@@R.count1.N@@P.pvcountf.1@@R.count1.N@ PREFIXES ;
@R.pvcountf.1@@R.count1.A@@P.pvcountf.2@@R.count1.A@ PREFIXES ;
@R.pvcountf.2@@R.count1.T@@P.pvcountf.3@@R.count1.T@ PREFIXES ;
@R.pvcountf.3@@R.count1.P@@P.pvcountf.4@@R.count1.P@ PREFIXES ;
0 PREVERBS ;

LEXICON BOUND
0:%< PV_COUNTER  ;

LEXICON PV_COUNTER
@D.pvcount@@P.pvcount.1@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.1@@P.pvcount.2@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.2@@P.pvcount.3@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.3@@P.pvcount.4@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.4@@P.pvcount.5@ PREVERBS ;
!@R.pvcount.5@@P.pvcount.6@ PREVERBS ;

LEXICON VERB_STEMS
@R.class.VAI@@R.pos.VERB@	VAI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VII@@R.pos.VERB@	VII_STEMS ;
@R.class.VTI@@R.pos.VERB@	VTI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VTA@@R.pos.VERB@	VTA_STEMS ;
@P.class.VAI@@R.pos.VERBALIZE@ INDEP_NA_STEMS ;
@P.class.VII@@R.pos.VERBALIZE@ INDEP_NI_STEMS ;

!!! Now we collect the verb and noun stems !!!

! I am going to include the concrete verb finals (see Frantz 2017 chapter 18.)
! The reason being that this is the best place to control them considering the four verb classes
! The relfexive changes VTA verbs into VAI verbs and takes VAI suffixes. The same is true of the reciprocal. 
! The benfactive changes Intransitive to Transitive verbs.

!!!!! After this, we collect the stems !!!!!

! Blackfoot Regular Noun Stems

! Below are the INDEPENDENT noun stems and their allomorphic forms (only if the allomorph is irregular). 

LEXICON NOUN_STEMS
!@P.class.NA@0 
INDEP_NA_STEMS ;
!@P.class.NI@0 
INDEP_NI_STEMS ;
!@P.class.VAI@0	
VAI_STEMS ;
!@P.class.VII@0	
VII_STEMS ;
!@P.class.VTI@0	
VTI_STEMS ;
!@P.class.VTA@0	
VTA_STEMS ;

! Blackfoot Regular Noun Stems

! Below are the INDEPENDENT noun stems and their allomorphic forms (only if the allomorph is irregular). 

! When working with the lexicon, be sure to know the following lexical information:
! 1. Does it ALWAYS take the /-im/ suffix when possessed? If so, use NA_IM or NI_IM
! 2. Does the word take a short person prefix? If so, put %^SP at the beginning of the stem
! 3. What allomorphy does the stem undergo? If it takes oh-, put h at the beginning of the stem. If i -> o, use i3. If a -> i2, use a4. 
! If a -> o, use a3. 
! 4. Everything else should be accounted for in the phonology

LEXICON DEP_STEMS
@P.pos.NA@ DEP_NA_STEMS ;
@P.pos.NI@ DEP_NI_STEMS ;

LEXICON DEP_NA_STEMS
! Test Stems
! nohkówa:ohkó                NAD ;
! naaáhsa:maaáhs              NAD ;
! nitána:itán                 NAD ;
! niksíssta:iksísst           NAD ;
! Full list
naaáhsa:maaáhs	NAD "weight: 22.1531" ;
naakiaaahsa:aakiaaahs	NAD "weight: 26.5619" ;
náákiima:áákiim	NAD "weight: 16.0496" ;
náwahkahtaana:áwahkahtaan	NAD "weight: 31.106" ;
ni'sa:i's	NAD "weight: 19.9116" ;
ni'sohkiimaana:i'sohkiimaan	NAD "weight: 38.6082" ;
niihkawawa:iihkawa	NAD "weight: 24.2325" ;
niihsissa:iihsiss	NAD "weight: 21.0181" ;
nikííhtsimaana:ikííhtsimaan	NAD "weight: 21.943" ;
niksimmotsiima:iksimmotsiim	NAD "weight: 23.4216" ;
niksíssta:iksísst	NAD "weight: 13.277" ;
nikso'kowa:ikso'kowa	NAD "weight: 39.5244" ;
nimssa:imss	NAD "weight: 15.5796" ;
ninaaáhsa:inaaáhs	NAD "weight: 24.0626" ;
ninaapiima:inaapiim	NAD "weight: 26.142" ;
ninna:inn	NAD "weight: 1.16062" ;
nínssta:ínsst	NAD "weight: 13.277" ;
nippitaama:ippitaam	NAD "weight: 25.9189" ;
nisahkínaima:isahkínaim	NAD "weight: 24.0704" ;
nisahkómaapiima:isahkómaapiim	NAD "weight: 30.3562" ;
nissa:iss	NAD "weight: 19.9116" ;
nisskána:isskán	NAD "weight: 15.5796" ;
nissohkiimaana:issohkiimaan	NAD "weight: 38.385" ;
nissohkowa:issohko	NAD "weight: 23.6571" ;
níssoko'sa:íssoko's	NAD "weight: 26.8904" ;
nissotana:issotan	NAD "weight: 16.2728" ;
nisstamowa:isstamo	NAD "weight: 16.7428" ;
nisstamoohkowa:isstamoohko	NAD "weight: 24.1271" ;
nitana:itan	NAD "weight: 6.73376" ;
niitsistowahsina:niitsistowahsin	NAD "weight: 54.2932" ;
nohkówa:ohkó	NAD "weight: 6.77822" ;
nohpapiiyihpa:ohpapiiyihp	NAD "weight: 20.9773" ;
nohpatooma:ohpatoom	NAD "weight: 20.3895" ;
noko'sa:oko's	NAD "weight: 18.8129" ;
nokoksissta:okoksisst	NAD "weight: 32.3166" ;
nokonna:okonn	NAD "weight: 7.38435" ;
nomahkinaima:omahkinaim	NAD "weight: 14.4915" ;
nooma:oom	NAD "weight: 5.24429" ;
nootoohkiimaana:ootoohkiimaan	NAD "weight: 28.162" ;
nootoyooma:ootoyoom	NAD "weight: 13.0869" ;
noppitaama:oppitaam	NAD "weight: 25.9189" ;
nóta'sa:óta's	NAD "weight: 11.4286" ;
noyínnaawa:oyínnaa	NAD "weight: 17.2536" ;
nisskáni'taama:sskáni'taam	NAD "weight: 22.4532" ;
niyiihkowa:yiihkowa	NAD "weight: 40.3046" ;

LEXICON DEP_NI_STEMS
nookóówayi:ookóówan     NID "weight: 15.3077" ;
nookóówayi:ookóówa     NID "weight: 15.3077" ;

! These are the Blackfoot verb stems.
! They are organized by their inflectional classes.
! All allomorphic triggers have been added

LEXICON PRENOUNS
0 NOUN_STEMS ;
PV/ai'tamáak+:ai'tamáak BOUND3 "weight: 76.0407" ;
PV/anaw+:anaw BOUND3 "weight: 9.17611" ;
PV/assaak+:assaak BOUND3 "weight: 11.4286" ;
PV/iiht+:iiht BOUND3 "weight: 7.47136" ;
PV/iimá+:iimá BOUND3 "weight: 7.2302" ;
PV/iitsiksist+:iitsiksist BOUND3 "weight: 21.5777" ;
PV/ikamo't+:ikamo't BOUND3 "weight: 14.3004" ;
PV/ikippa'+:i2kippa' BOUND3 "weight: 12.7174" ;
PV/iksksowa'+:iksksowa' BOUND3 "weight: 24.3503" ;
PV/inai't+:inai't BOUND3 "weight: 76.0407" ;
PV/ipapa+:ipapa BOUND3 "weight: 5.15076" ;
PV/ippoa+:ippoa BOUND3 "weight: 76.0407" ;
PV/isk+:isk BOUND3 "weight: 14.8865" ;
PV/istsa'+:i2stsa' BOUND3 "weight: 20.1992" ;
PV/iton+:iton BOUND3 "weight: 16.8481" ;
PV/kan+:hkan BOUND3 "weight: 15.4619" ;
PV/káátsisto+:káátsisto BOUND3 "weight: 29.9429" ;
PV/mato+:mato BOUND3 "weight: 14.4502" ;
PV/mo'tóí+:mo'tóí BOUND3 "weight: 8.48296" ;
PV/niitsi+:niitsi BOUND3 "weight: 25.0434" ;
PV/o'kio+:o'kio BOUND3 "weight: 15.1333" ;
PV/ohpii+:ohpii BOUND3 "weight: 16.2728" ;
PV/oka'p+:oka'p BOUND3 "weight: 7.67203" ;
PV/omo'tap+:omo'tap BOUND3 "weight: 76.0407" ;
PV/onaki+:onaki BOUND3 "weight: 15.3565" ;
PV/otomohk+:otomohk BOUND3 "weight: 14.4502" ;
PV/sa+:saw BOUND3 "weight: 12.9484" ;
PV/sootam+:i2sootam BOUND3 "weight: 14.3449" ;
PV/waahki+:waahki BOUND3 "weight: 24.8203" ;
PV/yook+:yook BOUND3 "weight: 9.17611" ;
PN/aaká+:aaká	BOUND3 "weight: 8.77065" ;
PN/aká+:aká	BOUND3 "weight: 6.37275" ;
PN/ayaam+:ayaam	BOUND3 "weight: 9.86926" ;
PN/iki'ta+:i2ki'ta	BOUND3 "weight: 16.0496" ;
PN/iksisto+:i2ksisto	BOUND3 "weight: 28.5566" ;
PN/ipahtsi+:i2pahtsi	BOUND3 "weight: 22.4044" ;
PN/iss+:iss	BOUND3 "weight: 16.2728" ;
PN/itsin+:itsin	BOUND3 "weight: 16.9659" ;
PN/mattsi+:mattsi	BOUND3 "weight: 17.6591" ;
PN/nimm+:nimm	BOUND3 "weight: 17.6591" ;
PN/ohpo+:ohpo	BOUND3 "weight: 7.78982" ;
PN/oohsi+:oohsi	BOUND3 "weight: 15.8673" ;
PN/paahksíst+:paahksíst	BOUND3 "weight: 11.5543" ;
PN/sainnis+:sainnis	BOUND3 "weight: 19.9116" ;
PN/sikim+:i2sikim	BOUND3 "weight: 22.3354" ;
PN/ssk+:ssk	BOUND3 "weight: 13.7879" ;
PN/waaist+:waaist	BOUND3 "weight: 23.6571" ;
PN/waawow+:waawow	BOUND3 "weight: 16.5605" ;
LEXICON PREVERBS
0 VERB_STEMS ;
PV/ai'tamáak+:ai'tamáak BOUND "weight: 76.0407" ;
PV/anaw+:anaw BOUND "weight: 9.17611" ;
PV/assaak+:assaak BOUND "weight: 11.4286" ;
PV/iiht+:iiht BOUND "weight: 7.47136" ;
PV/iimá+:iimá BOUND "weight: 7.2302" ;
PV/iitsiksist+:iitsiksist BOUND "weight: 21.5777" ;
PV/ikamo't+:ikamo't BOUND "weight: 14.3004" ;
PV/ikippa'+:i2kippa' BOUND "weight: 12.7174" ;
PV/iksksowa'+:iksksowa' BOUND "weight: 24.3503" ;
PV/inai't+:inai't BOUND "weight: 76.0407" ;
PV/ipapa+:ipapa BOUND "weight: 5.15076" ;
PV/ippoa+:ippoa BOUND "weight: 76.0407" ;
PV/isk+:isk BOUND "weight: 14.8865" ;
PV/istsa'+:i2stsa' BOUND "weight: 20.1992" ;
PV/iton+:iton BOUND "weight: 16.8481" ;
PV/kan+:hkan BOUND "weight: 15.4619" ;
PV/káátsisto+:káátsisto BOUND "weight: 29.9429" ;
PV/mato+:mato BOUND "weight: 14.4502" ;
PV/mo'tóí+:mo'tóí BOUND "weight: 8.48296" ;
PV/niitsi+:niitsi BOUND "weight: 25.0434" ;
PV/o'kio+:o'kio BOUND "weight: 15.1333" ;
PV/ohpii+:ohpii BOUND "weight: 16.2728" ;
PV/oka'p+:oka'p BOUND "weight: 7.67203" ;
PV/omo'tap+:omo'tap BOUND "weight: 76.0407" ;
PV/onaki+:onaki BOUND "weight: 15.3565" ;
PV/otomohk+:otomohk BOUND "weight: 14.4502" ;
PV/sa+:saw BOUND "weight: 12.9484" ;
PV/sootam+:i2sootam BOUND "weight: 14.3449" ;
PV/waahki+:waahki BOUND "weight: 24.8203" ;
PV/yook+:yook BOUND "weight: 9.17611" ;
PN/aaká+:aaká	BOUND "weight: 8.77065" ;
PN/ayaam+:ayaam	BOUND "weight: 9.86926" ;
PN/iki'ta+:i2ki'ta	BOUND "weight: 16.0496" ;
PN/iksisto+:i2ksisto	BOUND "weight: 28.5566" ;
PN/ipahtsi+:i2pahtsi	BOUND "weight: 22.4044" ;
PN/iss+:iss	BOUND "weight: 16.2728" ;
PN/itsin+:itsin	BOUND "weight: 16.9659" ;
PN/mattsi+:mattsi	BOUND "weight: 17.6591" ;
PN/nimm+:nimm	BOUND "weight: 17.6591" ;
PN/ohpo+:ohpo	BOUND "weight: 7.78982" ;
PN/oohsi+:oohsi	BOUND "weight: 15.8673" ;
PN/paahksíst+:paahksíst	BOUND "weight: 11.5543" ;
PN/sainnis+:sainnis	BOUND "weight: 19.9116" ;
PN/sikim+:i2sikim	BOUND "weight: 22.3354" ;
PN/ssk+:ssk	BOUND "weight: 13.7879" ;
PN/waaist+:waaist	BOUND "weight: 23.6571" ;
PN/waawow+:waawow	BOUND "weight: 16.5605" ;
